Mississippi, session 2026, SB2767.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  Section 13-1-245, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 13-1-245.  (1)  As used in this section: (a)  "Bank" means any state or national bank located in Mississippi. (b) "Custodian" includes a bank's operations officer and any other person who is an official custodian of the bank's records, as well as their deputies and assistants. (c) "Customer" means any person or authorized representative of a person who has maintained or is maintaining an account or deposit of any type, or has utilized or is utilizing any service of a bank, or for whom a bank has acted or is acting as a fiduciary in relation to an account or deposit maintained in the person's name. (d)  "Financial record" means any record in any form, or information derived from such record, that is maintained by a bank and pertains to a deposit or account of a customer, a service of the bank utilized by a customer or any other relationship between a customer and the bank. (e)  "Governmental authority" includes the state, any political subdivision, district and court, and any agency, department, officer or authorized employee of any of those entities. (2)  In any state court proceeding, if any party, including a governmental authority, requests a subpoena duces tecum (to be construed hereinafter to include a court order) to require a bank to assemble or provide a customer's financial records, and the bank is not a party to the proceeding or is a party solely by reason of its holding assets of another party defendant with no cause of action alleged against the bank, the party requesting the subpoena shall pay to the court conducting the proceeding all reasonable charges of the bank in searching for, reproducing and transporting the records.  This payment shall be made promptly when the copy of the records is delivered to the proper person, as provided in subsection (4) of this section, whether or not the financial records are entered into evidence, and the amount of the payment shall be the amount certified by the custodian in the affidavit required by subsection (6) of this section.  The payment of these reasonable charges shall be in addition to any witness fees. (3)  Except as hereinafter provided, when a subpoena duces tecum is served upon a custodian of records of any bank in any state court proceeding in which the bank is not a party, or in which the bank is a party solely by reason of its holding assets of another party defendant with no cause of action alleged against the bank, and such subpoena requires the production of a customer's financial records, it shall be deemed sufficient compliance if the custodian shall furnish a true and correct copy of all records described in the subpoena. (4)  The copy of the records shall be separately enclosed in an inner envelope or wrapper, sealed, with the title and number of the action, name of witness and date of subpoena clearly inscribed thereon.  The sealed envelope or wrapper shall then be enclosed in an outer envelope or wrapper, sealed, and directed as follows:  If the subpoena directs attendance in court, to the clerk of such court or to the judge thereof; if the subpoena directs attendance at a deposition, to the officer before whom the deposition is to be taken, at a place designated in the subpoena for the taking of the deposition or at his place of business; in other cases, to the officer, body or tribunal conducting the hearing, at a like address. (5)  Unless the sealed envelope or wrapper is returned to a witness who is to appear personally, the copy of the records shall remain sealed and shall be opened only at the time of trial, deposition or other hearing, upon the direction of the judge, court, officer, body or tribunal conducting the proceeding, in the presence of all parties who have appeared in person or by counsel at such trial, deposition or hearing.  However, the sealed envelope or wrapper may be opened and the records examined prior to the trial, deposition or hearing upon written consent of all parties or their counsel of record. (6)  The records shall be accompanied by an affidavit of a custodian stating in substance:  (a) that the affiant is a duly authorized custodian of the records and has authority to certify such records; (b) that the copy is a true copy of all the records described in the subpoena; (c) that the records were prepared by the personnel of the bank, bank officers or persons acting under the control of either, in the ordinary course of the bank's business at or near the time of the act, condition or event reported therein; and (d) certifying the amount of the reasonable charges of the bank for furnishing such copies.  If the bank has none of the records described or only part thereof, the custodian shall so state in the affidavit and furnish the affidavit and such records as are available.  The furnishing of the affidavit with respect to such reasonable charges shall be sufficient proof of such expense, which shall be taxed as costs of the court.  All reasonable charges paid hereunder shall be remitted to the bank not later than final determination of the suit by the court where the suit is initiated. (7)  The copy of the record shall be admissible in evidence to the same extent as though the original thereof were offered and the custodian had been present and testified to the matters stated in the affidavit.  The affidavit shall be admissible in evidence and the matters stated therein shall be presumed true in the absence of a preponderance of evidence to the contrary. (8)  In rare cases where the personal attendance of the custodian may be required, the subpoena duces tecum shall contain a clause which reads:  "The procedure authorized pursuant to subsection (3) of this section will not be deemed sufficient compliance with this subpoena." (9)  In rare cases where the personal attendance of the custodian and the production of the original record may be required, the subpoena duces tecum shall contain a clause which reads: "Original records are required and the procedure authorized pursuant to subsection (3) of this section will not be deemed sufficient compliance with this subpoena." If the bank does not have such original record, it shall furnish such copies as it may have and shall be compensated as provided for in this section. (10)  Original records may be withdrawn after introduction into evidence and copies substituted, unless otherwise directed for good cause by the court, judge, officer, body or tribunal conducting the hearing.  The custodian may prepare copies of original records in advance of testifying for the purpose of making substitution of the original record, and reasonable charges for furnishing such copies shall be taxed as costs of the court.  If copies are not prepared in advance, they can be made and substituted at any time after introduction of the original record, and reasonable charges for furnishing such copies shall be taxed as costs of the court. SECTION 2.  Section 23-15-47, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 23-15-47.  (1)  Any person who is qualified to register to vote in the State of Mississippi may register to vote by mail-in application in the manner prescribed in this section. (2)  The following procedure shall be used in the registration of electors by mail: (a)  Any qualified elector may register to vote by mailing or delivering a completed mail-in application to his or her county registrar at least thirty (30) days before any election; however, if the thirtieth day to register before an election falls on a Sunday or legal holiday, the registration applications submitted on the business day immediately following the Sunday or legal holiday shall be accepted and entered into the Statewide Elections Management System for the purpose of enabling voters to vote in the next election.  The postmark date of a mailed application shall be the applicant's date of registration. (b)  Upon receipt of a mail-in application, the county registrar shall stamp the application with the date of receipt, and shall verify the application either by matching the applicant's Mississippi driver's license number through the Mississippi Department of Public Safety or by matching the applicant's social security number through the American Association of Motor Vehicle Administrators.  Within fourteen (14) days of receipt of a mail-in registration application, the county registrar shall complete action on the application, including any attempts to notify the applicant of the status of his or her application. (c)  If the county registrar determines that the applicant is qualified and his or her application is legible and complete, the county registrar shall mail the applicant written notification that the application has been approved, specifying the county voting precinct, municipal voting precinct, if any, polling place and supervisor district in which the person shall vote.  This written notification of approval containing the specified information shall be the voter's registration card.  The registration card shall be provided by the county registrar to the applicant in accordance with Section 23-15-39.  Upon entry of the voter registration information into the Statewide Elections Management System, the system shall assign a voter registration number to the applicant. The assigned voter registration number shall be clearly shown on the written notification of approval.  In mailing the written notification, the county registrar shall note the following on the envelope:  "DO NOT FORWARD".  If any registration notification form is returned as undeliverable, the voter's registration shall be void. (d)  A mail-in application shall be rejected for any of the following reasons: (i)  An incomplete portion of the application makes it impossible for the registrar to determine the eligibility of the applicant to register; (ii)  A portion of the application is illegible in the opinion of the county registrar and makes it impossible to determine the eligibility of the applicant to register; (iii)  The county registrar is unable to determine, from the address and information stated on the application, the precinct in which the voter should be assigned or the supervisor district in which he or she is entitled to vote; (iv)  The applicant is not qualified to register to vote pursuant to Section 23-15-11; (v)  The county registrar determines that the applicant is already registered as a qualified elector of the county; (vi)  The county registrar is unable to verify the application pursuant to subsection (2)(b) of this section. (e)  If the mail-in application of a person is subject to rejection for any of the reasons set forth in paragraph (d)(i) through (iii) of this subsection, and it appears to the county registrar that the defect or omission is of such a minor nature and that any necessary additional information may be supplied by the applicant over the telephone or by further correspondence, the county registrar may write or call the applicant at the telephone number or address, or both, provided on the application.  If the county registrar is able to contact the applicant by mail or telephone, the county registrar shall attempt to ascertain the necessary information, and if this information is sufficient for the registrar to complete the application, the applicant shall be registered.  If the necessary information cannot be obtained by mail or telephone, or is not sufficient to complete the application within fourteen (14) days of receipt, the county registrar shall give the applicant written notice of the rejection and provide the reason for the rejection.  The county registrar shall further inform the applicant that he or she has a right to attempt to register by appearing in person or by filing another mail-in application. (f)  If a mail-in application is subject to rejection for the reason stated in paragraph (d)(v) of this subsection and the "present home address" portion of the application is different from the residence address for the applicant found in the Statewide Elections Management System, the mail-in application shall be deemed a written request to update the voter's registration pursuant to Section 23-15-13.  The county registrar or the election commissioners shall update the voter's residence address in the Statewide Elections Management System and, if necessary, advise the voter of a change in the location of his or her county or municipal polling place by mailing the voter a new voter registration card. (3)  The instructions and the application form for voter registration by mail shall be in a form established by rule duly adopted by the Secretary of State. (4)  (a)  The Secretary of State shall prepare and furnish without charge the necessary forms for application for voter registration by mail to each county registrar, municipal clerk, all public schools, each private school that requests such applications, and all public libraries. (b)  The Secretary of State shall distribute without charge sufficient forms for application for voter registration by mail to the Commissioner of Public Safety, who shall distribute the forms to each driver's license examining and renewal station in the state, and shall ensure that the forms are regularly available to the public at such stations. (c)  Bulk quantities of forms for application for voter registration by mail shall be furnished by the Secretary of State to any person or organization.  The Secretary of State shall charge a person or organization the actual cost he or she incurs in providing bulk quantities of forms for application for voter registration to such person or organization. (5)  The originals of completed mail-in applications shall remain on file in the office of the county registrar with copies retained in the Statewide Elections Management System. (6)  If the applicant indicates on the application that he or she resides within the city limits of a city or town in the county of registration, the county registrar shall enter the information into the Statewide Elections Management System. (7)  If the applicant indicates on the application that he or she has previously registered to vote in another county of this state or another state, notice to the voter's previous county of registration in this state shall be provided through the Statewide Elections Management System.  If the voter's previous place of registration was in another state, notice shall be provided to the voter's previous state of residence. (8)  Any person who attempts to register to vote by mail shall be subject to the penalties for false registration provided for in Section 23-15-17. SECTION 3.  Section 23-15-79, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 23-15-79.  (1)  Unless the application for registration was made pursuant to Section 23-15-47, the date of registration to vote shall be the date the application for registration to vote was initially received by the registrar or, if submitted by mail, the postmark date, regardless of the date on which the county election commission, circuit court or Supreme Court, as the case may be, makes its final determination allowing the registration. (2)  In the case of an application for registration that has been made pursuant to Section 23-15-47, the date of registration to vote shall be the date the complete and legible application form is received by the county registrar, or, if mailed, the postmark date of the complete and legible application. SECTION 4.  Section 23-15-299, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 23-15-299.  (1)  (a) Assessments made pursuant to subsection (1)(a), (b), (c) and (d) of Section 23-15-297 shall be paid by each candidate who seeks a nomination in the political party election to the secretary of the state executive committee with which the candidate is affiliated by 5:00 p.m. on February 1 of the year in which the primary election for the office is held or on the date of the qualifying deadline provided by statute for the office, whichever is earlier; however, no such assessments may be paid before January 1 of the year in which the primary election for the office is held.  If February 1 or the date of the qualifying deadline provided by statute for the office occurs on a Saturday, Sunday or legal holiday, then the assessments required to be paid by this paragraph (a) shall be paid by 5:00 p.m. on the business day immediately following the Saturday, Sunday or legal holiday. (b)  Assessments made pursuant to subsection (3)(a), (b) and (c) of Section 23-15-297 shall be paid by each independent candidate or special election candidate to the Secretary of State by 5:00 p.m. on February 1 of the year in which the primary election for the office is held or on the date of the qualifying deadline provided by statute for the office, whichever is earlier; however, no such assessments may be paid before January 1 of the year in which the primary election for the office is held.  If February 1 or the date of the qualifying deadline provided by statute for the office occurs on a Saturday, Sunday or legal holiday, then the assessments required to be paid by this paragraph (b) shall be paid by 5:00 p.m. on the business day immediately following the Saturday, Sunday or legal holiday. (2)  (a)  Assessments made pursuant to subsection (1)(e) and (f) of Section 23-15-297, shall be paid by each candidate who seeks a nomination in the political party election to the circuit clerk of that candidate's county of residence by 5:00 p.m. on February 1 of the year in which the primary election for the office is held or on the date of the qualifying deadline provided by statute for the office, whichever is earlier; however, no such assessments may be paid before January 1 of the year in which the election for the office is held.  If February 1 or the date of the qualifying deadline provided by statute for the office occurs on a Saturday, Sunday or legal holiday, then the assessments required to be paid by this paragraph (a) shall be paid by 5:00 p.m. on the business day immediately following the Saturday, Sunday or legal holiday.  The circuit clerk shall forward the fee and all necessary information to the secretary of the proper county executive committee within two (2) business days.  No candidate may attempt to qualify with any political party that does not have a duly organized county executive committee, and the circuit clerk shall not accept any assessments paid for nonlegislative offices pursuant to subsection (1)(e) and (f) of Section 23-15-297 if the circuit clerk does not have contact information for the secretary of the county executive committee for that political party. (b)  Assessments made pursuant to subsection (3)(d) and (e) of Section 23-15-297 shall be paid by each independent candidate or special election candidate to the circuit clerk of that candidate's county of residence by 5:00 p.m. on February 1 of the year in which the primary election for the office is held or on the date of the qualifying deadline provided by statute for the office, whichever is earlier; however, no such assessments may be paid before January 1 of the year in which the primary election for the office is held.  If February 1 or the date of the qualifying deadline provided by statute for the office occurs on a Saturday, Sunday or legal holiday, then the assessments required to be paid by this paragraph (b) shall be paid by 5:00 p.m. on the business day immediately following the Saturday, Sunday or legal holiday.  The circuit clerk shall forward the fee and all necessary information to the secretary of the proper county election commission within two (2) business days. (3)  (a)  Assessments made pursuant to subsection (1)(g) and (h) of Section 23-15-297 must be paid by each candidate who seeks a nomination in the political party election to the secretary of the state executive committee with which the candidate is affiliated by 5:00 p.m. seventy-five (75) days before the congressional preference primary; however, no such assessments may be paid before December 1 of the year before the primary election for the office is held.   If seventy-five (75) days before the congressional preference primary in years in which a congressional preference primary occurs on a Saturday, Sunday or legal holiday, then the assessments required to be paid by this paragraph (a) shall be paid by 5:00 p.m. on the business day immediately following the Saturday, Sunday or legal holiday. (b)  Assessments made pursuant to subsection (3)(f) and (g) of Section 23-15-297 must be paid by each independent candidate or special election candidate to the Secretary of State by 5:00 p.m. seventy-five (75) days before the congressional preference primary in years in which a congressional preference primary is held; however, no such assessments may be paid before December 1 of the year in which the primary election for the office is held.   If seventy-five (75) days before the congressional preference primary occurs on a Saturday, Sunday or legal holiday, then the assessments required to be paid by this paragraph (b) shall be paid by 5:00 p.m. on the business day immediately following the Saturday, Sunday or legal holiday. (4)  (a)  The fees paid pursuant to subsections (1), (2) and (3) of this section shall be accompanied by an affidavit under penalty of perjury containing the name, physical address of the candidate's residence, the party with which he or she is affiliated, if applicable, the candidate's phone number, the email address of the candidate, if any, and the office for which he or she is a candidate.  Such affidavit shall require the candidate to certify that he or she meets all qualifications for the office for which he or she is a candidate. (b)  The state executive committee shall transmit to the Secretary of State a copy of the written statements and required documents accompanying the fees paid pursuant to subsections (1) and (2) of this section.  All copies must be received by the Office of the Secretary of State by not later than 6:00 p.m. on the date of the qualifying deadline; provided, however, the failure of the Office of the Secretary of State to receive such copies by 6:00 p.m. on the date of the qualifying deadline shall not affect the qualification of a person who pays the required fee and files the required statement and the required documents by 5:00 p.m. on the date of the qualifying deadline.  The Secretary of State shall assess a Five Hundred Dollar ($500.00) fine to any state executive committee that fails to transmit any written statements and other required documents and accompanying fees to the Secretary of State by 6:00 p.m. on the date of the qualifying deadline.  Such fine shall be assessed for each written statement and other required documents and fees that were not turned in to the Office of the Secretary of State by 6:00 p.m.; however, in no case shall the total fines assessed to a state executive committee exceed Two Thousand Five Hundred Dollars ($2,500.00) for a particular qualifying deadline.  The Secretary of State shall deposit any fines received from any state executive committee into the Elections Support Fund established in Section 23-15-5.  The name of any person who pays the required fee and files the required statement and documents after 5:00 p.m. on the date of the qualifying deadline shall not be placed on the primary election ballot or the general election ballot. (5)  The Secretary of State or the secretary or circuit clerk to whom such payments are made shall promptly receipt for same stating the office for which the candidate making payment is running and the political party with which he or she is affiliated, if applicable, and he or she shall keep an itemized account in detail showing the exact time and date of the receipt of each payment received by him or her and, where applicable, the date of the postmark on the envelope containing the fee and from whom, and for what office the party paying same is a candidate. (6)  The secretaries of the proper executive committee shall hold the funds to be finally disposed of by order of their respective executive committees.  The funds may be used or disbursed by the executive committee receiving same to pay all necessary traveling or other necessary expenses of the members of the executive committee incurred in discharging their duties as committee members, and of their secretary and may pay the secretary such salary as may be reasonable.  The Secretary of State shall deposit any qualifying fees received from candidates into the Elections Support Fund established in Section 23-15-5. (7)  (a)  Upon receipt of the proper fee and all necessary information, the proper executive committee or the Secretary of State, whichever is applicable, shall then determine the following: (i)  Whether each candidate is a qualified elector of the state, state district, county or county district which they seek to serve; and (ii)  Whether each candidate meets all other qualifications to hold the office he or she is seeking or presents absolute proof that he or she will, subject to no contingencies, meet all qualifications on or before the date of the general or special election at which he or she could be elected to office; and (iii)  Whether the candidate has taken the steps necessary to qualify for more than one (1) office at the election; and (iv)  Whether any candidate has been convicted of any of the following and not pardoned: 1.  Any felony in a court of this state, 2.  On or after December 8, 1992, any offense in another state which is a felony under the laws of this state, 3.  Any felony in a federal court on or after December 8, 1992, or 4.  Any offense that involved the misuse or abuse of his or her office or money coming into his or her hands by virtue of the office.  Excepted from the above are convictions of manslaughter and violations of the United States Internal Revenue Code or any violations of the tax laws of this state; and (v)  Whether the candidate has voted in any election outside of the jurisdiction in which he or she seeks to represent during the period in which the candidate is required to have resided within the jurisdiction.  If a candidate is found to have voted in any election outside of the jurisdiction that he or she seeks to represent during the period in which the candidate is required to have resided within the jurisdiction, the name of such candidate shall not appear on the ballot. However, if a candidate who votes in an election that he or she was properly registered for is then subsequently redistricted into the jurisdiction that he or she is currently seeking to represent, then he or she shall not be disqualified as a candidate due to voting in an election outside of his or her current jurisdiction during the required residency period. (b)  The proper executive committee or the Secretary of State, whichever is applicable, shall make the determinations in paragraph (a) of this subsection within the following time periods: (i)  Five (5) days of the qualifying deadline during presidential preference primary elections; or (ii)  Fifteen (15) days of the qualifying deadline for federal mid-term elections; or (iii)  Thirty (30) days of the qualifying deadline during statewide elections. If the proper executive committee or the Secretary of State, whichever is applicable, finds that a candidate either (i) is not a qualified elector, (ii) does not meet all qualifications to hold the office he or she seeks and fails to provide absolute proof, subject to no contingencies, that he or she will meet the qualifications on or before the date of the general or special election at which he or she could be elected, or (iii) has been convicted of a felony or other disqualifying offense as described in paragraph (a) of this subsection, and not pardoned, then the executive committee shall notify the candidate and give the candidate an opportunity to be heard.  The executive committee shall mail notice to the candidate at least three (3) business days before the hearing to the address provided by the candidate on the qualifying forms, and the committee shall attempt to contact the candidate by telephone, email and facsimile if the candidate provided this information on the forms.  If the candidate fails to appear at the hearing or to prove that he or she meets all qualifications to hold the office subject to no contingencies, then the name of that candidate shall not be placed upon the ballot. (c)  If the proper executive committee or the Secretary of State, whichever is applicable, determines that the candidate has taken the steps necessary to qualify for more than one (1) office at the election, the action required by Section 23-15-905, shall be taken. (d)  Where there is but one (1) candidate for each office contested at the primary election, the proper executive committee or the Secretary of State, whichever is applicable, when the time has expired within which the names of candidates shall be furnished shall declare such candidates the nominees. (8)  No candidate may qualify by filing the information required by this section by using the internet. SECTION 5.  Section 23-15-631, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 23-15-631.  (1)  The registrar shall enclose with each ballot mailed to an absent elector separate printed instructions furnished by the registrar containing the following: (a)  All absentee voters, excepting those with temporary or permanent physical disabilities or those who are sixty-five (65) years of age or older, who mark their ballots in the county of the residence shall use the registrar of that county as the witness.  The absentee voter shall come to the office of the registrar and neither the registrar nor his or her deputy shall be required to go out of the registrar's office to serve as an attesting witness. (b)  Upon receipt of the enclosed ballot, you will not mark the ballot except in view or sight of the attesting witness.  In the sight or view of the attesting witness, mark the ballot according to instructions. (c)  After marking the ballot, fill out and sign the "ELECTOR'S CERTIFICATE" in the box on the back of the envelope so that the signature is across the flap of the envelope to ensure the integrity of the ballot.  All absent electors shall have the attesting witness sign the "ATTESTING WITNESS CERTIFICATE" in the box across the flap on the back of the envelope.  A portion of the elector's signature extending outside of the box shall not be grounds for rejecting that elector's ballot.  Place the necessary postage on the envelope and deposit it in the post office or some government receptacle provided for the deposit of mail so that the absent elector's ballot will be postmarked on or before the date of the election and received by the registrar no more than five (5) business days after the election.  The ballot may only be transmitted by the United States Postal Service or other common carriers, including, but not limited to, United Parcel Service or FedEx Corporation. Any notary public, United States postmaster, assistant United States postmaster, United States postal supervisor, clerk in charge of a contract postal station, or other officer having authority to administer an oath or take an acknowledgment may be an attesting witness; provided, however, that in the case of an absent elector who is temporarily or permanently physically disabled, the attesting witness may be any person eighteen (18) years of age or older and such person is not required to have the authority to administer an oath.  If a postmaster, assistant postmaster, postal supervisor, or clerk in charge of a contract postal station acts as an attesting witness, his or her signature in a box on the elector's certificate must be authenticated by the cancellation stamp of their respective post offices.  If an officer having authority to administer an oath or take an acknowledgment acts as attesting witness, his or her signature in a box on the elector's certificate, together with his or her title and address, but no seal, shall be required.  A portion of the elector's signature extending outside of the box shall not be grounds for rejecting that elector's ballot.  Any affidavits made by an absent elector who is in the Armed Forces may be executed before a commissioned officer, warrant officer, or noncommissioned officer not lower in grade than sergeant rating or any person authorized to administer oaths. (d)  When the application accompanies the ballot it shall not be returned in the same envelope as the ballot but shall be returned in a separate pre-addressed envelope provided by the registrar. (e)  A candidate for public office, or the spouse, parent or child of a candidate for public office, may not be an attesting witness for any absentee ballot upon which the candidate's name appears, unless the voter is related within the first degree to the candidate or the spouse, parent or child of the candidate. (f)  Any voter casting an absentee ballot who declares that he or she requires assistance to vote by reason of blindness, temporary or permanent physical disability or inability to read or write, shall be entitled to receive assistance in the marking of his or her absentee ballot and in completing the affidavit on the absentee ballot envelope.  The voter may be given assistance by anyone of the voter's choice other than a candidate whose name appears on the absentee ballot being marked, the spouse, parent or child of a candidate whose name appears on the absentee ballot being marked or the voter's employer, an agent of that employer or a union representative; however, a candidate whose name is on the ballot or the spouse, parent or child of such candidate may provide assistance upon request to any voter who is related within the first degree.  In order to ensure the integrity of the ballot, any person who provides assistance to an absentee voter shall be required to sign and complete the "Certificate of Person Providing Voter Assistance" on the absentee ballot envelope. (2)  The foregoing instructions required to be provided by the registrar to the elector shall also constitute the substantive law pertaining to the handling of absentee ballots by the elector and registrar. (3)  The Secretary of State shall prepare instructions on how absent voters may comply with the identification requirements of Section 23-15-563. SECTION 6.  Section 23-15-645, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 23-15-645.  (1)  Absentee ballots cast in the registrar's office and received by mail that are deposited into a sealed ballot box shall be processed on election day but not tallied until after closing of the polls and announced simultaneously with all other votes cast on election day. (2)  After the votes have been counted, the officials shall preserve all applications, envelopes and the list of absent voters along with the mailed paper and paper ballots and other election materials and return the same to the registrar. (3)  Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, for federal and presidential general, special or primary elections, packages of protested, void and wholly blank ballots, voted ballots, open packages of unused ballots, sealed packages of unused ballots, and all absentee and military ballots and ballot envelopes, if any, shall be preserved for twenty-two (22) months after the date of any such general, special or primary election. For all other statewide, county or municipal elections, sealed packages of unused ballots, packages of protested, void and wholly blank ballots, open packages of unused ballots and all absentee and military ballots and ballot envelopes shall be retained for four (4) months, and may then be destroyed, provided a certificate articulating the election district identifying data and numbers of such ballots is filed with the balance of ballots described in this section, for the balance of the twenty-two-month retention period. SECTION 7.  Section 25-1-107, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 25-1-107.  Except as otherwise specifically provided by law, whenever any check, money order or other form of payment or reports is required to be made to any state agency or any county, municipality or other political subdivision of the state by or before a certain date and the mailing is made by United States mail, then the date that the mail containing the payment or report is postmarked by the United States Post Office shall be considered as the date the payment or report is made.  The date of the United States Post Office postmark is proof of the date of payment or report if the payment or report was mailed with postage paid and was correctly addressed. SECTION 8.  Section 41-9-105, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 41-9-105.  The copy of the records shall be separately enclosed in an inner-envelope or wrapper, sealed, with the title and number of the action, name of witness and date of subpoena clearly inscribed thereon. The sealed envelope or wrapper shall then be enclosed in an outer-envelope or wrapper, sealed, and directed as follows: If the subpoena directs attendance in court, to the clerk of such court or to the judge thereof; if the subpoena directs attendance at a deposition, to the officer before whom the deposition is to be taken, at the place designated in the subpoena for the taking of the deposition or at his place of business; in other cases, to the officer, body or tribunal conducting the hearing, at a like address. SECTION 9.  Section 53-3-7, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 53-3-7.  (1)  (a)  When two (2) or more separately owned tracts of land are embraced within an established drilling unit or when there are separately owned interests in all or part of an established drilling unit the persons owning the drilling rights therein and the rights to share in the production therefrom may validly agree to integrate their interests and to develop their lands as a drilling unit.  Where, however, such persons have not agreed to integrate their interests the board may, for the prevention of waste or to avoid the drilling of unnecessary wells, require such persons to integrate their interests and to develop their lands as a drilling unit.  All orders requiring such pooling shall be made after notice and hearing, and shall be upon terms and conditions that are just and reasonable, and will afford to the owner of each tract the opportunity to recover or receive his just and equitable share of the oil and gas in the pool without unnecessary expense. The portion of the production allocated to the owner of each tract included in a drilling unit formed by a pooling order shall, when produced, be considered as if it had been produced from such tract by a well drilled thereon. (b)  Except as otherwise provided for in this section, in the event such pooling is required, the cost of development and operation of the pooled unit chargeable by the operator to the other interested owner or owners shall be limited to the actual expenditures required for such purpose not in excess of what are reasonable including a reasonable charge for supervision.  In the event that the operator elects to proceed under the provisions of this subsection (1)(b), and does not elect to seek alternate charges as provided for in this section, the notice procedure followed shall be in accordance with Section 53-1-21, Mississippi Code of 1972. (c)  For the purposes of this section, as to a drilling unit, the term "nonconsenting owner" shall mean an owner of drilling rights which the owner has not agreed, in writing, to integrate in the drilling unit.  The owner may own other drilling rights in the unit which the owner has agreed, in writing, to integrate in the unit and thereby also be a "consenting owner" as to the interest which the owner has agreed to integrate in the unit. (2)  (a)  In the event that one or more owners owning not less than thirty-three percent (33%) of the drilling rights in a drilling unit voluntarily consent to the drilling of a unit well thereon, and the operator has made a good faith effort to (i) negotiate with each nonconsenting owner to have said owner's interest voluntarily integrated into the unit, (ii) notify each nonconsenting owner of the names of all owners of drilling rights who have agreed to integrate any interests in the unit, (iii) ascertain the address of each nonconsenting owner, (iv) give each nonconsenting owner written notice of the proposed operation, specifying the work to be performed, the location, proposed depth, objective formation and the estimated cost of the proposed operation, and (v) offer each nonconsenting owner the opportunity to lease or farm out on reasonable terms or to participate in the cost and risk of developing and operating the unit well involved on reasonable terms, by agreeing in writing, then the operator may petition the board to allow it to charge alternate charges (alternate to and in lieu of the charges provided for in subsection (1)(b) of this section). (b)  Any such petition on which alternate charges may be ordered by the board shall include a statement which shall name all nonconsenting real parties in interest in said proposed drilling unit, as of a date not more than ninety (90) days prior to the filing of the petition, giving each such person's name, and address if known; and if any owner's address is not known, the operator shall state in its petition that such person's address is unknown after diligent search and inquiry.  Only those parties served with actual or constructive notice as set forth hereinbelow will be subject to any alternate charges allowed by the board. (c)  Upon the filing of a petition on which alternate charges may be ordered, the petitioner shall have prepared, and furnish to the board with said petition, a notice to each and all nonconsenting real parties in interest whose address is unknown, whether such person be a resident of the State of Mississippi or not, which the board shall have published, noticing each such person to appear before a regular meeting of the board sufficiently distant in time to allow thirty (30) days to elapse between the date of the last publication of said notice as hereinafter provided, and the date of the regular meeting of the board to which each such person is noticed.  Said notice shall also notice all unknown heirs or devisees of deceased owners, if any there be, and all unknown persons owning drilling rights in said proposed drilling unit.  The notice shall be substantially in the following form, to wit: NOTICE TO APPEAR BEFORE THE STATE OIL AND GAS BOARD You are noticed to appear before the State Oil and Gas Board at its regular ____ term, being on the __ day of ____, 20__ to show cause if you can why the petition of_____________ ______________________________________________________________ (Operator) being Petition No._____________ in said board and seeking to force to integrate and pool all interests in (description of Unit by legal description) _______________________________________________ should not be granted. To _____ (inserting the name of such person or persons, whose address is unknown), and all such unknown heirs or devisees and all such unknown owners, whose names and addresses remain unknown after diligent search and inquiry. Said meeting of said board shall be held at________ (the then hearing room of said Oil and Gas Board) on the above date at__________. (the time) This_____ day of ___________, A.D.____. ________________ Supervisor (d)  The publication of notice to nonconsenting real parties in interest whose address is unknown after diligent search and inquiry shall be made once in each week during three (3) successive weeks in a public newspaper of the county or counties in which the proposed drilling unit is located, if there be such a newspaper.  If there is not such a county newspaper, then the said publication of notice shall be published in a newspaper having general circulation in the State of Mississippi.  The period of publication shall be deemed to be completed at the end of twenty-one (21) days from the date of the first publication, provided there have been three (3) publications made as hereinabove required. (e)  Upon the filing of a petition on which alternate charges may be ordered, the petitioner shall also have prepared, and shall furnish to the board, a notice which shall be substantially in the form set out above, to each nonconsenting real party in interest whose address is known, together with addressed and stamped envelopes, and the board shall mail each notice by certified mail, return receipt requested, sufficiently distant in time to allow thirty (30) days to elapse between the date of the mailing of said notice and the date of the regular meeting of the board at which said petition will be first scheduled to be heard. (f)  Petitioner shall also advance to the board at the time of the filing of said petition the cost of publication and mailing of notices as set out above which shall be established by the board.  Said costs of publication and mailing of notices shall be considered as part of the costs of operation which are chargeable to the nonconsenting owner's nonconsenting share of production as set forth in paragraph (g) of this subsection (2). (g)  In the event a pooling order is issued by the board, and any nonconsenting owner does not subsequently agree in writing as provided for herein, and if the operations on the existing or proposed well which are described in the pooling order are actually commenced within one (1) year after the pooling order is issued by the board, and thereafter with due diligence and without undue delay, the existing or proposed well is actually completed as a well capable of producing oil, gas and/or other minerals in quantities sufficient to yield a return in excess of monthly operating costs, then, subject to the limitations set out in this section, the operator and/or the appropriate consenting owners shall be entitled to receive as alternate charges (alternate to and in lieu of the charges provided for in subsection (1)(b) of this section; provided, however, that in no event shall the operator and/or the appropriate consenting owners be entitled to recover less than such charges provided in subsection (1)(b) of this section) the share of production from the well attributable to the nonconsenting owner's nonconsenting interests in the unit established or subsequently reformed for production therefrom, until the point in time when the proceeds from the sale of such share, calculated at the well, or the market value thereof if such share is not sold, after deducting production and excise taxes, which operator will pay or cause to be paid, and the payment required by this paragraph (g) shall equal the sum of: (i)  One hundred percent (100%) of the nonconsenting owner's nonconsenting share of the cost of any newly acquired surface equipment beyond the wellhead connections including, but not limited to, stock tanks, separators, treaters, pumping equipment and piping; and (ii)  Two hundred fifty percent (250%) of that portion of the costs and expenses of the operations provided for in the pooling order, and two hundred fifty percent (250%) of that portion of the cost of newly acquired equipment in the well, including wellhead connections, which would have been chargeable to the nonconsenting owner's nonconsenting share thereof; provided, however, when a mineral interest that is severed from the surface estate is owned by a nonconsenting owner or when a mineral interest is subject to an oil and gas lease that is owned by a nonconsenting owner, the payment under this subparagraph (ii) shall be three hundred percent (300%); and (iii)  One hundred percent (100%) of the nonconsenting owner's nonconsenting share of the cost of operation of the well commencing with first production and continuing to such point in time. Whenever a drilling unit established by a pooling order issued by the board under subsection (2) of this section is to be reformed or altered by the board for good cause, after notice and hearing, then the interest of any nonconsenting owner listed in the pooling order who received notice of the application to reform or alter the unit and had not agreed in writing as provided for herein shall remain subject to the charges set forth in this subsection (2)(g) with respect to its interest in the reformed or altered unit.  If there is any nonconsenting owner within a proposed reformed or altered unit who has not been previously provided the information and offers set forth in subparagraphs (ii) through (v) of subsection (2)(a) of this section which was sent to the owners, and if the applicant for an order of reformation or alteration of such unit provides to the nonconsenting owner the information and offers set forth in subparagraphs (ii) through (v) of subsection (2)(a) of this section at the same time and in the same manner as such nonconsenting owners receive notice of the application to reform or alter the drilling unit, then the interest of any nonconsenting owner listed in the pooling order for the reformed or altered unit who does not agree in writing as provided for herein shall be subject to the charges set forth in this subsection (2)(g) with respect to its interest in the reformed or altered unit. Whenever any one (1) operator has filed for alternate charges on two (2) drilling units, which units are direct, partially direct or diagonal offsets one to the other, such operator may not file a petition for alternate charges, as distinguished from the charges provided by subsection (1)(b), as to any additional units which are direct, partially direct or diagonal offsets to the said first two (2) units of that operator until said operator has drilled, tested and completed the first two (2) such wells, as wells capable of production or completed as dry holes or either, and has filed completion reports on said first two (2) wells with the board, or the permits for such well or wells have expired if one or both of them be not drilled. The pooling order if issued shall provide that each nonconsenting owner shall be afforded the opportunity to participate in the development and operation of the well in the pooled unit as to all or any part of said owner's interest on the same costs basis as the consenting owners by agreeing in writing to pay that part of the costs of such development and operation chargeable to said nonconsenting owner's interest, or to enter into such other written agreement with the operator as the parties may contract, provided such acceptance in writing is filed with the board within twenty (20) days after the pooling order is filed for record with the board. The pooling order shall provide that the well be drilled on a competitive contract, arms length, basis; provided, however, that the operator may employ its own tools or those of affiliates, but charges therefor shall not exceed the prevailing rates in the area. (h)  Within sixty (60) days after the completion of any operation on which alternate charges have been ordered, the operator shall furnish any nonconsenting owner who may request same an inventory of the equipment in and connected to the well, and an itemized statement of the cost of drilling, deepening, plugging back, testing, completing and equipping the well for production; or, at its option, the operator, in lieu of an itemized statement of such costs of operation, may submit detailed monthly statements of said costs.  Each month thereafter, during the time the operator and/or consenting parties are being reimbursed, the operator shall furnish any nonconsenting owner who may request same with an itemized statement of all costs and liabilities incurred in the operation of the well, together with a statement of the quantity of oil and gas produced from it and the amount of proceeds realized from the sale of the well's production during the preceding month.  Any amount realized from the sale or other disposition of equipment acquired in connection with any such operation which would have been owned by a nonconsenting owner had it participated therein as to its nonconsenting interest shall be credited against the total unreturned costs of the work done and of the equipment purchased in determining when the interest of such nonconsenting owner shall be owned by said nonconsenting owner as above provided; and if there is a credit balance, it shall be paid to such nonconsenting owner.  From the point in time provided for in paragraph (g) of this subsection (2), each nonconsenting owner shall own the same interest in such well, the material and equipment in or pertaining thereto, and the production therefrom as such nonconsenting owner would have been entitled to had it participated in the drilling, reworking, deepening and/or plugging back of said well.  Thereafter, except as otherwise provided in this section, the operator shall be entitled to charge each nonconsenting owner such nonconsenting owner's proportionate part of all reasonable costs incurred by the operator in operating the unit well and the unit, including a reasonable charge for supervision, and in the event such nonconsenting owner fails to pay such proportionate share of such costs within thirty (30) days after receipt by the nonconsenting owner of a valid invoice, the operator shall be entitled to receive such nonconsenting owner's share of production until such time as such unpaid share of costs shall have been recovered by the operator. (i)  In the event that a leased interest is subject to an order of pooling and integration, and the operator and/or the appropriate consenting owners are entitled to alternate charges as provided by paragraph (g) of this subsection (2), and if there be no reasonable question as to good and merchantable title to the royalty interest, the lessor of said lease shall be paid, by the operator or purchaser of production, the proceeds attributable to said lessor's contracted royalty, not to exceed an amount of three-sixteenths (3/16) of the proceeds attributable to the nonconsenting owner's proportionate share of production.  Nothing herein contained shall affect or diminish in any way the responsibility of the nonconsenting owner to account for the payment of any royalty or other payment, not paid as herein provided, which may burden or be attributable to the interest owned by such nonconsenting owner. (3)  When production of oil or gas is not secured in paying quantities as a result of such integration or pooling of interests, there shall be no charge payable by the nonconsenting owner or owners as to such owner's nonconsenting interest. (4)  In the event of any dispute relative to costs, the board shall determine the proper costs, after due notice to all interested parties and a hearing thereon.  Appeals may be taken from such determination as from any other order of the board. (5)  The State Oil and Gas Board shall in all instances where a unit has been formed out of lands or areas of more than one (1) ownership, require the operator when so requested by an owner, to deliver to such owner or his assigns his proportionate share of the production from the well common to such drilling unit; but where necessary, such owner receiving same shall provide at his own expense proper receptacles for the receipt or storage of such oil, gas or distillate. (6)  Should the persons owning the drilling or other rights in separate tracts embraced within a drilling unit fail to agree upon the integration of the tracts and the drilling of a well on the unit, and should it be established that the board is without authority to require integration as provided in this section, then, subject to all other applicable provisions of this chapter, and of Chapter 1 of this title, the owner of each tract embraced within the drilling unit may drill on his tract; but the allowable production from such tract shall be such proportion of the allowable production for the full drilling unit as the area of such separately owned tract bears to the full drilling unit. (7)  The State Oil and Gas Board in order to prevent waste and avoid the drilling of unnecessary wells may permit (i) the cycling of gas in any pool or portion thereof or (ii) the introduction of gas or other substance into an oil or gas reservoir for the purpose of repressuring such reservoir, maintaining pressure or carrying on secondary recovery operations. The board shall permit the pooling or integration of separate tracts or separately owned interests when reasonably necessary in connection with such operations. (8)  Agreements made in the interests of conservation of oil or gas, or both, or for the prevention of waste, between and among owners or operators, or both, owning separate holdings in the same field or pool or in any area that appears from geologic or other data to be underlaid by a common accumulation of oil or gas, or both, and agreements between and among such owners or operators, or both, and royalty owners therein, for the purpose of bringing about the development and operation of the field, pool or area, or any part thereof, as a unit, and for establishing and carrying out a plan for the cooperative development and operation thereof, when such agreements are approved by the board, are hereby authorized and shall not be held or construed to violate any of the statutes of this state relating to trusts, monopolies or contracts and combinations in restraint of trade. SECTION 10.  Section 65-43-83, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 65-43-83.  (1)  If the affidavit of nonliability is returned to the governmental entity within thirty (30) days of the mailing of the notice of toll evasion violation, together with the proof of a written rental agreement or lease between a bona fide renting or leasing company and its customer which identifies the rentee or lessee and provides the driver's license number, name, and address of the rentee or lessee, the processing agency shall mail, by certified mail, return receipt requested, to the rentee or lessee identified in the affidavit of nonliability a final notice of toll evasion violation. (2)  If the affidavit of nonliability is returned with evidence that the registered owner served has made a bona fide sale or transfer of the vehicle and has delivered possession thereof to the purchaser prior to the date of the alleged violation, the processing agency shall cancel the notice of toll evasion violation with respect to that registered owner and the processing agency shall mail, by certified mail, return receipt requested, to the purchaser identified in the affidavit of nonliability a final notice of toll evasion violation.  If payment is not received within fifteen (15) days of the mailing of the final notice of toll evasion violation, the processing agency may proceed against the purchaser identified pursuant to Section 65-43-73. SECTION 11.  Section 69-35-11, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 69-35-11.  (1)  With respect to any referendum conducted under the provisions of this act, the state ADA and extension service shall, before calling and announcing such referendum, fix, determine and publicly announce at least thirty (30) days before the date determined upon for such referendum, the date, hours and polling places for voting in such referendum, the amount and basis of the assessment proposed to be collected, the means by which such assessment shall be collected if authorized by the producers, and the general purposes to which said amount so collected shall be applied.  No annual assessment levied under the provisions of this act shall exceed the federally mandated Fifteen Cents (15¢) per hundredweight of milk produced, however an amount not to exceed Ten Cents (10¢) per hundredweight of milk produced shall be credited to the state ADA for dairy product promotion or nutrition education programs. (2)  As an alternative method of conducting a referendum under the provisions of this act, the state ADA and extension service in its discretion may conduct the referendum by a mail ballot as herein provided.  In the event that a decision is made to conduct a mail ballot, public notice of said mail ballot shall be made at least thirty (30) days before the date of said referendum.  Said notice shall contain the same information required by subsection (1) of this section except that the notice will also state that the ballot is to be conducted by mail rather than at polling places.  The notice shall also state that official ballots are being mailed on a date specified in the notice to all bulk tank units known by the state ADA and extension service to be eligible to vote and that any bulk tank unit not receiving by mail an official ballot by a date specified in the notice will have ten (10) days thereafter to apply for an official ballot at the office of the state ADA.  The notice shall state the deadline for the receipt of all ballots and the address of the state ADA. (3)  Official ballots shall be prepared by the state ADA and extension service and mailed by first class mail to the last known address of all bulk tank units known to be eligible to vote.  As announced in the public notice, said ballots shall be made available for a period of not less than ten (10) days, to those who are eligible to vote in said referendum and did not receive a ballot by mail. (4)  Before any bulk tank unit shall receive an official ballot, he shall furnish such proof as the state ADA and extension service may require of his eligibility to vote in said referendum. The state ADA shall keep a list of those bulk tank units who receive official ballots.  No bulk tank unit may receive more than one (1) official ballot unless the bulk tank unit proves to the satisfaction of the state ADA and extension service that the ballot has been lost or destroyed. (5)  No votes shall be counted which are not on official ballots.  To be eligible to be counted, ballots must be received by the state ADA at the place and by the deadline previously announced in the public notice of said referendum. SECTION 12.  Section 73-11-53, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 73-11-53.  (1)  The State Board of Funeral Service is authorized to establish a trainee and apprenticeship program whereby persons desiring to apprentice as a funeral service or funeral director trainee may be issued a resident traineeship certificate to practice funeral directing or funeral service under the direct on-premises supervision of a sponsoring Mississippi licensed funeral director or funeral service practitioner. (2)  A person desiring to become a resident trainee for the practice of funeral service or funeral directing shall make application to the board.  Such application shall be verified by the licensee under whom the applicant is serving, and shall be accompanied by a nonrefundable application fee in an amount set by the board in accordance with Section 73-11-56.  When the board is satisfied as to the qualifications of an applicant, it shall issue a certificate of resident traineeship. (3)  The board shall have the power to suspend or revoke a certificate of a resident traineeship for violation of any provision of this chapter. (4)  A resident trainee must serve the apprenticeship in a funeral establishment that is licensed by the State of Mississippi and the preceptor must be a Mississippi licensed funeral service practitioner or funeral director who is employed by a Mississippi licensed funeral establishment and actively practicing within the State of Mississippi.  The funeral service trainee and apprenticeship program shall be completed within no less than twelve (12) months or more than eighteen (18) months under the direct supervision of a funeral director or funeral service licensee of the board.  The funeral director trainee and apprenticeship program shall be completed within no less than twelve (12) months or more than eighteen (18) months under the direct supervision of a funeral director or funeral service licensee of the board. (5)  A resident trainee may serve under the supervision of more than one (1) preceptor under conditions established by board rules and regulations.  The board may also adopt rules that will allow training at more than one (1) funeral establishment under special circumstances. (6)  A resident traineeship certificate shall be valid for one (1) year.  The board may renew a resident traineeship certificate if the trainee applies for renewal on a form provided by the board, shows that the training activity continues to satisfy applicable requirements and pays a renewal fee as set by the board.  The fee and application will be considered late if the fee and application are not in the office or show a postmark of December 31.  Applications received late may be reinstated by the payment of a renewal fee, a reinstatement fee and other applicable fees.  Failure to receive a renewal notice does not exempt a resident trainee from the required renewal of his/her traineeship. (7)  A resident trainee shall not advertise or hold himself out as a funeral director, funeral service practitioner, embalmer or use any other title or abbreviation indicating that the trainee is a funeral director, funeral service practitioner or embalmer.  A resident trainee does not have the rights and duties of a funeral director or funeral service licensee and is only authorized to act under the direct supervision of the approved preceptor. SECTION 13.  Section 83-9-5, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 83-9-5.  (1)  Required provisions.  Except as provided in subsection (3) of this section, each such policy delivered or issued for delivery to any person in this state shall contain the provisions specified in this subsection in the words in which the same appear in this section.  However, the insurer may, at its option, substitute for one or more of such provisions, corresponding provisions of different wording approved by the commissioner which are in each instance not less favorable in any respect to the insured or the beneficiary.  Such provisions shall be preceded individually by the caption appearing in this subsection or, at the option of the insurer, by such appropriate individual or group captions or subcaptions as the commissioner may approve. As used in this section, the term "insurer" means a health maintenance organization, an insurance company or any other entity responsible for the payment of benefits under a policy or contract of accident and sickness insurance; however, the term "insurer" shall not mean a liquidator, rehabilitator, conservator or receiver or third-party administrator of any health maintenance organization, insurance company or other entity responsible for the payment of benefits which is in liquidation, rehabilitation or conservation proceedings, nor shall it mean any responsible guaranty association.  Further, no cause of action shall accrue against a liquidator, rehabilitator, conservator or receiver or third-party administrator of any health maintenance organization, insurance company or other entity responsible for the payment of benefits which is in liquidation, rehabilitation or conservation proceedings or any responsible guaranty association under paragraph (h)3 of this subsection or any policy provision in accordance therewith. (a)  A provision as follows: Entire contract; changes: This policy, including the endorsements and the attached papers, if any, constitutes the entire contract of insurance.  No change in this policy shall be valid until approved by an executive officer of the insurer and unless such approval be endorsed hereon or attached hereto.  No agent has authority to change this policy or to waive any of its provisions. (b)  A provision as follows: Time limit on certain defenses: 1.  After two (2) years from the date of issue of this policy, no misstatements, except fraudulent misstatements, made by the applicant in the application for such policy shall be used to void the policy or to deny a claim for loss incurred or disability (as defined in the policy) commencing after the expiration of such two-year period. (The foregoing policy provision shall not be so construed as to effect any legal requirement for avoidance of a policy or denial of a claim during such initial two-year period, nor to limit the application of subsection (2)(a) and (2)(b) of this section in the event of misstatement with respect to age or occupation.) (A policy which the insured has the right to continue in force subject to its terms by the timely payment of premium (1) until at least age fifty (50) or, (2) in the case of a policy issued after age forty-four (44), for at least five (5) years from its date of issue, may contain in lieu of the foregoing the following provision (from which the clause in parentheses may be omitted at the insurer's option) under the caption "INCONTESTABLE": After this policy has been in force for a period of two (2) years during the lifetime of the insured (excluding any period during which the insured is disabled), it shall become incontestable as to the statements in the application.) 2.  No claim for loss incurred or disability (as defined in the policy) commencing after two (2) years from the date of issue of this policy shall be reduced or denied on the ground that a disease or physical condition not excluded from coverage by name or specific description effective on the date of loss had existed prior to the effective date of coverage of this policy. (c)  A provision as follows: Grace period: A grace period of seven (7) days for weekly premium policies, ten (10) days for monthly premium policies and thirty-one (31) days for all other policies will be granted for the payment of each premium falling due after the first premium, during which grace period the policy shall continue in force. (A policy which contains a cancellation provision may add, at the end of the above provision, "subject to the right of the insurer to cancel in accordance with the cancellation provision hereof." A policy in which the insurer reserves the right to refuse any renewal shall have, at the beginning of the above provision, "unless not less than five (5) days prior to the premium due date the insurer has delivered to the insured or has mailed to his last address as shown by the records of the insurer written notice of its intention not to renew this policy beyond the period for which the premium has been accepted.") (d)  A provision as follows: Reinstatement: If any renewal premium be not paid within the time granted the insured for payment, a subsequent acceptance of premium by the insurer or by any agent duly authorized by the insurer to accept such premium, without requiring in connection therewith an application for reinstatement, shall reinstate the policy.  However, if the insurer or such agent requires an application for reinstatement and issues a conditional receipt for the premium tendered, the policy will be reinstated upon approval of such application by the insurer or, lacking such approval, upon the forty-fifth day following the date of such conditional receipt unless the insurer has previously notified the insured in writing of its disapproval of such application.  The reinstated policy shall cover only loss resulting from such accidental injury as may be sustained after the date of reinstatement and loss due to such sickness as may begin more than ten (10) days after such date. In all other respects the insured and insurer shall have the same rights thereunder as they had under the policy immediately before the due date of the defaulted premium, subject to any provisions endorsed hereon or attached hereto in connection with the reinstatement.  Any premium accepted in connection with a reinstatement shall be applied to a period for which premium has not been previously paid, but not to any period more than sixty (60) days prior to the date of reinstatement.  (The last sentence of the above provision may be omitted from any policy which the insured has the right to continue in force subject to its terms by the timely payment of premiums (1) until at least age fifty (50) or, (2) in the case of a policy issued after age forty-four (44), for at least five (5) years from its date of issue.) (e)  A provision as follows: Notice of claim: Written notice of claim must be given to the insurer within thirty (30) days after the occurrence or commencement of any loss covered by the policy, or as soon thereafter as is reasonably possible.  Notice given by or on behalf of the insured or the beneficiary to the insurer at ________________ (insert the location of such office as the insurer may designate for the purpose), or to any authorized agent of the insurer, with information sufficient to identify the insured, shall be deemed notice to the insurer. (In a policy providing a loss of time benefit which may be payable for at least two (2) years, an insurer may, at its option, insert the following between the first and second sentences of the above provision:  "Subject to the qualifications set forth below, if the insured suffers loss of time on account of disability for which indemnity may be payable for at least two (2) years, he shall, at least once in every six (6) months after having given notice of claim, give to the insurer notice of continuance of said disability, except in the event of legal incapacity.  The period of six (6) months following any filing of proof by the insured or any payment by the insurer on account of such claim or any denial of liability, in whole or in part, by the insurer shall be excluded in applying this provision.  Delay in the giving of such notice shall not impair the insured's right to any indemnity which would otherwise have accrued during the period of six (6) months preceding the date on which such notice is actually given.") (f)  A provision as follows: Claim forms: The insurer, upon receipt of a notice of claim, will furnish to the claimant such forms as are usually furnished by it for filing proofs of loss.  If such forms are not furnished within fifteen (15) days after the giving of such notice, the claimant shall be deemed to have complied with the requirements of this policy as to proof of loss upon submitting, within the time fixed in the policy for filing proofs of loss, written proof covering the occurrence, the character and the extent of the loss for which claim is made. (g)  A provision as follows: Proofs of loss: Written proof of loss must be furnished to the insurer at its said office, in case of claim for loss for which this policy provides any periodic payment contingent upon continuing loss, within ninety (90) days after the termination of the period for which the insurer is liable, and in case of claim for any other loss, within ninety (90) days after the date of such loss.  Failure to furnish such proof within the time required shall not invalidate or reduce any claim if it was not reasonably possible to give proof within such time, provided such proof is furnished as soon as reasonably possible and in no event, except in the absence of legal capacity, later than one (1) year from the time proof is otherwise required. (h)  A provision as follows: Time of payment of claims: 1.  All benefits payable under this policy for any loss, other than loss for which this policy provides any periodic payment, will be paid within twenty-five (25) days after receipt of due written proof of such loss in the form of a clean claim where claims are submitted electronically, and will be paid within thirty-five (35) days after receipt of due written proof of such loss in the form of clean claim where claims are submitted in paper format.  Benefits due under the policies and claims are overdue if not paid within twenty-five (25) days or thirty-five (35) days, whichever is applicable, after the insurer receives a clean claim containing necessary medical information and other information essential for the insurer to administer preexisting condition, coordination of benefits and subrogation provisions.  A "clean claim" means a claim received by an insurer for adjudication and which requires no further information, adjustment or alteration by the provider of the services or the insured in order to be processed and paid by the insurer.  A claim is clean if it has no defect or impropriety, including any lack of substantiating documentation, or particular circumstance requiring special treatment that prevents timely payment from being made on the claim under this provision.  A clean claim includes resubmitted claims with previously identified deficiencies corrected.  Upon request, the insurer shall provide to the insured or the provider submitting a claim a written list of the information required and the documentation required for the insurer to deem a claim to be clean, and the insurer shall then be bound to such list.  Errors, such as system errors, attributable to the insurer, do not change the clean claim status. A clean claim does not include any of the following: a.  A duplicate claim, which means an original claim and its duplicate when the duplicate is filed within thirty (30) days of the original claim; b.  Claims which are submitted fraudulently or that are based upon material misrepresentations; c.  Claims that require information essential for the insurer to administer preexisting condition, coordination of benefits or subrogation provisions; or d.  Claims submitted by a provider more than thirty (30) days after the date of completion of service; if the provider does not submit the claim on behalf of the insured, then a claim is not clean when submitted more than thirty (30) days after the date of billing by the provider to the insured. Not later than twenty-five (25) days after the date the insurer actually receives an electronic claim, the insurer shall pay the appropriate benefit in full, or any portion of the claim that is clean, and notify the provider (where the claim is owed to the provider) or the insured (where the claim is owed to the insured) of the reasons why the claim or portion thereof is not clean and will not be paid and what substantiating documentation and information is required to adjudicate the claim as clean.  Not later than thirty-five (35) days after the date the insurer actually receives a paper claim, the insurer shall pay the appropriate benefit in full, or any portion of the claim that is clean, and notify the provider (where the claim is owed to the provider) or the insured (where the claim is owed to the insured) of the reasons why the claim or portion thereof is not clean and will not be paid and what substantiating documentation and information is required to adjudicate the claim as clean.  Any claim or portion thereof resubmitted with the supporting documentation and information requested by the insurer shall be paid within twenty (20) days after receipt. For purposes of this provision, the term "pay" means that the insurer shall either send cash or a cash equivalent by United States mail, or send cash or a cash equivalent by other means such as electronic transfer, in full satisfaction of the appropriate benefit due the provider (where the claim is owed to the provider) or the insured (where the claim is owed to the insured).  To calculate the extent to which any benefits are overdue, payment shall be treated as made on the date a draft or other valid instrument was placed in the United States mail to the last known address of the provider (where the claim is owed to the provider) or the insured (where the claim is owed to the insured) in a properly addressed, postpaid envelope, or, if not so posted, or not sent by United States mail, on the date of delivery of payment to the provider or insured. 2.  Subject to due written proof of loss, all accrued benefits for loss for which this policy provides periodic payment will be paid _______________ (insert period for payment which must not be less frequently than monthly), and any balance remaining unpaid upon the termination of liability will be paid within thirty (30) days after receipt of due written proof. 3.  If the claim is not denied for valid and proper reasons by the end of the applicable time period prescribed in this provision, the insurer must pay the provider (where the claim is owed to the provider) or the insured (where the claim is owed to the insured) interest on accrued benefits at the rate of three percent (3%) per month accruing from the day after payment was due on the amount of the benefits that remain unpaid until the claim is finally settled or adjudicated.  Whenever interest due pursuant to this provision is less than One Dollar ($1.00), such amount shall be credited to the account of the person or entity to whom such amount is owed.  The provisions of this subparagraph 3 shall not apply to any claims or benefits owed under Medicare Advantage plans or Medicare Advantage Prescription Drug plans. 4.  In the event the insurer fails to pay benefits when due, the person entitled to such benefits may bring action to recover such benefits, any interest which may accrue as provided in subparagraph 3 of this paragraph (h) and any other damages as may be allowable by law.  If it is determined in such action that the insurer acted in bad faith as evidenced by a repeated or deliberate pattern of failing to pay benefits and/or claims when due, the person entitled to such benefits (health care provider or insured) shall be entitled to recover damages in an amount up to three (3) times the amount of the benefits that remain unpaid until the claim is finally settled or adjudicated. (i)  A provision as follows: Payment of claims: Indemnity for loss of life will be payable in accordance with the beneficiary designation and the provisions respecting such payment which may be prescribed herein and effective at the time of payment.  If no such designation or provision is then effective, such indemnity shall be payable to the estate of the insured.  Any other accrued indemnities unpaid at the insured's death may, at the option of the insurer, be paid either to such beneficiary or to such estate.  All other indemnities will be payable to the insured.  When payments of benefits are made to an insured directly for medical care or services rendered by a health care provider, the health care provider shall be notified of such payment.  The notification requirement shall not apply to a fixed-indemnity policy, a limited benefit health insurance policy, medical payment coverage or personal injury protection coverage in a motor vehicle policy, coverage issued as a supplement to liability insurance or workers' compensation.  If the insured provides the insurer with written direction that all or a portion of any indemnities or benefits provided by the policy be paid to a licensed health care provider rendering hospital, nursing, medical or surgical services, then the insurer shall pay directly the licensed health care provider rendering such services; provided, however, licensed health care provider shall not include those in the practice of dentistry.  That payment shall be considered payment in full to the provider, who may not bill or collect from the insured any amount above that payment, other than the deductible, coinsurance, copayment or other charges for equipment or services requested by the insured that are noncovered benefits. Any dispute between a provider and the insured arising under these provisions regarding assignment of benefits and billing may be resolved by the Commissioner of Insurance.  The Commissioner of Insurance shall adopt any rules and regulations necessary to enforce these provisions regarding assignment of benefits and billing. (The following provision may be included with the foregoing provision at the option of the insurer: "If any indemnity of this policy shall be payable to the estate of the insured, or to an insured or beneficiary who is a minor or otherwise not competent to give a valid release, the insurer may pay such indemnity, up to an amount not exceeding $______________ (insert an amount which must not exceed One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00)), to any relative by blood or connection by marriage of the insured or beneficiary who is deemed by the insurer to be equitably entitled thereto.  Any payment made by the insurer in good faith pursuant to this provision shall fully discharge the insurer to the extent of such payment.") (j)  A provision as follows: Physical examinations: The insurer at his own expense shall have the right and opportunity to examine the person of the insured when and as often as it may reasonably require during the pendency of a claim hereunder. (k)  A provision as follows: Legal actions: No action at law or in equity shall be brought to recover on this policy prior to the expiration of sixty (60) days after written proof of loss has been furnished in accordance with the requirements of this policy.  No such action shall be brought after the expiration of three (3) years after the time written proof of loss is required to be furnished. (l)  A provision as follows: Change of beneficiary: Unless the insured makes an irrevocable designation of beneficiary, the right to change the beneficiary is reserved to the insured, and the consent of the beneficiary or beneficiaries shall not be requisite to surrender or assignment of this policy, or to any change of beneficiary or beneficiaries, or to any other changes in this policy. (The first clause of this provision, relating to the irrevocable designation of beneficiary, may be omitted at the insurer's option.) (2)  Other provisions. Except as provided in subsection (3) of this section, no such policy delivered or issued for delivery to any person in this state shall contain provisions respecting the matters set forth below unless such provisions are in the words in which the same appear in this section.  However, the insurer may, at its option, use in lieu of any such provision a corresponding provision of different wording approved by the commissioner which is not less favorable in any respect to the insured or the beneficiary.  Any such provision contained in the policy shall be preceded individually by the appropriate caption appearing in this subsection or, at the option of the insurer, by such appropriate individual or group captions or subcaptions as the commissioner may approve. (a)  A provision as follows: Change of occupation: If the insured be injured or contract sickness after having changed his occupation to one classified by the insurer as more hazardous than that stated in this policy or while doing for compensation anything pertaining to an occupation so classified, the insurer will pay only such portion of the indemnities provided in this policy as the premium paid would have purchased at the rates and within the limits fixed by the insurer for such more hazardous occupation.  If the insured changes his occupation to one classified by the insurer as less hazardous than that stated in this policy, the insurer, upon receipt of proof of such change of occupation, will reduce the premium rate accordingly, and will return the excess pro rata unearned premium from the date of change of occupation or from the policy anniversary date immediately preceding receipt of such proof, whichever is the most recent.  In applying this provision, the classification of occupational risk and the premium rates shall be such as have been last filed by the insurer prior to the occurrence of the loss for which the insurer is liable, or prior to date of proof of change in occupation, with the state official having supervision of insurance in the state where the insured resided at the time this policy was issued; but if such filing was not required, then the classification of occupational risk and the premium rates shall be those last made effective by the insurer in such state prior to the occurrence of the loss or prior to the date of proof of change in occupation. (b)  A provision as follows: Misstatement of age: If the age of the insured has been misstated, all amounts payable under this policy shall be such as the premium paid would have purchased at the correct age. (c)  A provision as follows: Relation of earnings to issuance: If the total monthly amount of loss of time benefits promised for the same loss under all valid loss of time coverage upon the insured, whether payable on a weekly or monthly basis, shall exceed the monthly earnings of the insured at the time disability commenced or his average monthly earnings for the period of two (2) years immediately preceding a disability for which claim is made, whichever is the greater, the insurer will be liable only for such proportionate amount of such benefits under this policy as the amount of such monthly earnings or such average monthly earnings of the insured bears to the total amount of monthly benefits for the same loss under all such coverage upon the insured at the time such disability commences and for the return of such part of the premiums paid during such two (2) years as shall exceed the pro rata amount of the premiums for the benefits actually paid hereunder; but this shall not operate to reduce the total monthly amount of benefits payable under all such coverage upon the insured below the sum of Two Hundred Dollars ($200.00) or the sum of the monthly benefits specified in such coverages, whichever is the lesser, nor shall it operate to reduce benefits other than those payable for loss of time. (The foregoing policy provision may be inserted only in a policy which the insured has the right to continue in force subject to its terms by the timely payment of premiums (1) until at least age fifty (50) or, (2) in the case of a policy issued after age forty-four (44), for at least five (5) years from its date of issue.  The insurer may, at its option, include in this provision a definition of "valid loss of time coverage," approved as to form by the commissioner, which definition shall be limited in subject matter to coverage provided by governmental agencies or by organizations subject to regulations by insurance law or by insurance authorities of this or any other state of the United States or any province of Canada, or to any other coverage the inclusion of which may be approved by the commissioner, or any combination of such coverages.  In the absence of such definition, such term shall not include any coverage provided for such insured pursuant to any compulsory benefit statute (including any workers' compensation or employer's liability statute), or benefits provided by union welfare plans or by employer or employee benefit organizations.) (d)  A provision as follows: Unpaid premium: Upon the payment of a claim under this policy, any premium then due and unpaid or covered by any note or written order may be deducted therefrom. (e)  A provision as follows: Cancellation: The insurer may cancel this policy at any time by written notice delivered to the insured, or mailed to his last address as shown by the records of the insurer, stating when, not less than five (5) days thereafter, such cancellation shall be effective; and after the policy has been continued beyond its original term, the insured may cancel this policy at any time by written notice delivered or mailed to the insurer, effective upon receipt or on such later date as may be specified in such notice.  In the event of cancellation, the insurer will return promptly the unearned portion of any premium paid.  If the insured cancels, the earned premium shall be computed by the use of the short-rate table last filed with the state official having supervision of insurance in the state where the insured resided when the policy was issued.  If the insurer cancels, the earned premium shall be computed pro rata.  Cancellation shall be without prejudice to any claim originating prior to the effective date of cancellation. (f)  A provision as follows: Conformity with state statutes: Any provision of this policy which, on its effective date, is in conflict with the statutes of the state in which the insured resides on such date is hereby amended to conform to the minimum requirements of such statutes. (g)  A provision as follows: Illegal occupation: The insurer shall not be liable for any loss to which a contributing cause was the insured's commission of or attempt to commit a felony or to which a contributing cause was the insured's being engaged in an illegal occupation. (h)  A provision as follows: Intoxicants and narcotics: The insurer shall not be liable for any loss sustained or contracted in consequence of the insured's being intoxicated or under the influence of any narcotic unless administered on the advice of a physician. (3)  Inapplicable or inconsistent provisions.  If any provision of this section is, in whole or in part, inapplicable to or inconsistent with the coverage provided by a particular form of policy, the insurer, with the approval of the commissioner, shall omit from such policy any inapplicable provision or part of a provision, and shall modify any inconsistent provision or part of the provision in such manner as to make the provision as contained in the policy consistent with the coverage provided by the policy. (4)  Order of certain policy provisions.  The provisions which are the subject of subsections (1) and (2) of this section, or any corresponding provisions which are used in lieu thereof in accordance with such subsections, shall be printed in the consecutive order of the provisions in such subsections or, at the option of the insurer, any such provision may appear as a unit in any part of the policy, with other provisions to which it may be logically related, provided the resulting policy shall not be, in whole or in part, unintelligible, uncertain, ambiguous, abstruse or likely to mislead a person to whom the policy is offered, delivered or issued. (5)  Third-party ownership.  The word "insured," as used in Sections 83-9-1 through 83-9-21, Mississippi Code of 1972, shall not be construed as preventing a person other than the insured with a proper insurable interest from making application for and owning a policy covering the insured, or from being entitled under such a policy to any indemnities, benefits and rights provided therein. (6)  Requirements of other jurisdictions. (a)  Any policy of a foreign or alien insurer, when delivered or issued for delivery to any person in this state, may contain any provision which is not less favorable to the insured or the beneficiary than the provisions of Sections 83-9-1 through 83-9-21, Mississippi Code of 1972, and which is prescribed or required by the law of the state under which the insurer is organized. (b)  Any policy of a domestic insurer may, when issued for delivery in any other state or country, contain any provision permitted or required by the laws of such other state or country. (7)  Filing procedure. The commissioner may make such reasonable rules and regulations concerning the procedure for the filing or submission of policies subject to the cited sections as are necessary, proper or advisable to the administration of said sections.  This provision shall not abridge any other authority granted the commissioner by law. (8)  Administrative penalties. (a)  If the commissioner finds that an insurer, during any calendar year, has paid at least eighty-five percent (85%), but less than ninety-five percent (95%), of all clean claims received from all providers during that year in accordance with the provisions of subsection (1)(h) of this section, the commissioner may levy an aggregate penalty in an amount not to exceed Ten Thousand Dollars ($10,000.00).  If the commissioner finds that an insurer, during any calendar year, has paid at least fifty percent (50%), but less than eighty-five percent (85%), of all clean claims received from all providers during that year in accordance with the provisions of subsection (1)(h) of this section, the commissioner may levy an aggregate penalty in an amount of not less than Ten Thousand Dollars ($10,000.00) nor more than One Hundred Thousand Dollars ($100,000.00).  If the commissioner finds that an insurer, during any calendar year, has paid less than fifty percent (50%) of all clean claims received from all providers during that year in accordance with the provisions of subsection (1)(h) of this section, the commissioner may levy an aggregate penalty in an amount not less than One Hundred Thousand Dollars ($100,000.00) nor more than Two Hundred Thousand Dollars ($200,000.00).  In determining the amount of any fine, the commissioner shall take into account whether the failure to achieve the standards in subsection (1)(h) of this section were due to circumstances beyond the control of the insurer.  The insurer may request an administrative hearing to contest the assessment of any administrative penalty imposed by the commissioner pursuant to this subsection within thirty (30) days after receipt of the notice of assessment. (b)  Examinations to determine compliance with subsection (1)(h) of this section may be conducted by the commissioner or any of his examiners.  The commissioner may contract with qualified impartial outside sources to assist in examinations to determine compliance.  The expenses of any such examinations shall be paid by the insurer examined. (c)  Nothing in the provisions of subsection (1)(h) of this section shall require an insurer to pay claims that are not covered under the terms of a contract or policy of accident and sickness insurance. (d)  An insurer and a provider may enter into an express written agreement containing timely claim payment provisions which differ from, but are at least as stringent as, the provisions set forth under subsection (1)(h) of this section, and in such case, the provisions of the written agreement shall govern the timely payment of claims by the insurer to the provider.  Any such written agreement shall contain a provision that the insurer shall provide to the insured or the provider submitting a claim a written list of the information required and the documentation required for the insurer to deem a claim to be clean, and the insurer shall then be bound to such list.  If the express written agreement is silent as to any interest penalty where claims are not paid in accordance with the agreement, the interest penalty provision of subsection (1)(h)3 of this section shall apply.  The commissioner shall have jurisdiction and authority to ensure any written agreement complies with the foregoing requirements.  Further, the commissioner shall have jurisdiction and authority to apply the Administrative Penalties set forth in subsection (8) of this section to the written agreement. (e)  The commissioner may adopt rules and regulations necessary to ensure compliance with this subsection. (9)  The commissioner may adopt rules and regulations necessary to ensure compliance with the provisions of this section. SECTION 14.  Section 97-19-57, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 97-19-57.  (1)  As against the maker, drawer or payor thereof, the making, drawing, issuing, uttering, delivering, or initiation of a check, draft, order, electronically converted check, or electronic commercial debit payment of which is refused by the drawee, shall be prima facie evidence and create a presumption of intent to defraud and of knowledge of insufficient funds in, or on deposit with, such bank, corporation, firm or person, provided such maker, drawer or payor shall not have paid the holder or payee thereof the amount due thereon, together with a service charge of Forty Dollars ($40.00), within fifteen (15) days after receiving notice that such check, draft, order, electronically converted check, or electronic commercial debit has not been paid by the drawee or payor's bank. (2)  For purposes of Section 11-7-12, the form of the notice provided for in subsection (1) of this section for a check, draft, order, or electronically converted check shall be sent by regular mail and shall be substantially as follows:  "This statutory notice is provided pursuant to Section 97-19-57, Mississippi Code of 1972.  You are hereby notified that a check, draft, order, or electronically converted check numbered _____, apparently issued by you on _____ (date), drawn upon _____ (name of bank), and payable to _____, has been dishonored.  Pursuant to Mississippi law, you have fifteen (15) days from receipt of this notice to tender payment of the full amount of such check, draft or order, or electronically converted check plus a service charge of Forty Dollars ($40.00), the total amount due being $_____.  Failure to pay this amount in full within the time specified above shall be prima facie evidence of and create a presumption of both the intent to defraud and the knowledge of insufficient funds in, or on deposit with, such bank in violation of Section 97-19-55." (3)  For purposes of Section 97-19-67, the form of the notice provided for in subsection (1) of this section for a check, draft, order, or electronically converted check shall be sent by regular mail, supported by an affidavit of service by mailing, and shall be substantially as follows:  "This statutory notice is provided pursuant to Section 97-19-57, Mississippi Code of 1972.  You are hereby notified that a check, draft, order, or electronically converted check numbered _____, apparently issued by you on _____ (date), drawn upon _____ (name of bank), and payable to _____, has been dishonored.  Pursuant to Mississippi law, you have fifteen (15) days from receipt of this notice to tender payment of the full amount of such check, draft or order, or electronically converted check plus a service charge of Forty Dollars ($40.00), the total amount due being $_____. Unless this amount is paid in full within the time specified above, the holder may assume that you delivered the instrument with intent to defraud and may turn over the dishonored instrument and all other available information relating to this incident to the proper authorities for criminal prosecution." (4) For purposes of Sections 11-7-12 and 97-19-67, the form of notice provided for in subsection (1) of this section for an electronic commercial debit shall be sent by regular mail, supported by an affidavit of service by mailing, and shall be substantially as follows:  "This statutory notice is provided pursuant to Section 97-19-57, Mississippi Code of 1972.  You are hereby notified that on ______(date) an electronic commercial debit was initiated by_____(name of payee bank) on behalf of _______ (payee) to  ___________ (name of payor bank) through the ACH Network requesting a payment in the amount of $_______ to ___________ (payee) from your account pursuant to invoice number ________ and our agreement dated ________, but that payment has been dishonored.  Pursuant to Mississippi law, because the payee delivered ___________ (goods or service) to you in reliance upon the agreement, you have fifteen (15) days from receipt of this notice to tender payment of the full amount of such electronic commercial debit plus a service charge of Forty Dollars ($40.00), the total amount due being $_______.  Failure to pay this amount in full within the time specified above shall be prima facie evidence of and create a presumption of both the intent to defraud and the knowledge of insufficient funds in, or on deposit with, such bank in violation of Section 97-19-55, and the payee may assume that you entered into such agreement with intent to defraud and may turn over all documentation related to the dishonored electronic commercial debit to the proper authorities for criminal prosecution." (5)  If any notice is returned undelivered to the sender after such notice was mailed to the address printed on the check, draft or order, or to the address given by the accused at the time of issuance of the instrument, such return shall be prima facie evidence of the maker's or drawer's intent to defraud. (6)  Affidavit of service by mail shall be adequate if made in substantially the following form: "STATE OF ____________ COUNTY OF ____________ ________________, being first duly sworn on oath, deposes and states that he/she is at least eighteen (18) years of age and that on (date)______________, 2___, he/she served the attached Notice of Dishonor by placing a true and correct copy thereof securely enclosed in an envelope addressed as follows: ______________________________ ______________________________ ______________________________ and deposited the same, postage prepaid, in the United States mail at ________________________, __________________________. __________________________________ (signature) Subscribed to and sworn before me, this the ________ day of _____________________, 2___. _________________________________ (Notary Public) My commission expires: (SEAL)" (7)  Without in any way limiting the provisions of this section, this section shall apply to a draft for the payment of money given for a motor vehicle even if such payment is conditioned upon delivery of documents necessary for transfer of a valid title to the purchaser. SECTION 15.  Section 65-43-79, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 65-43-79.  (1)  Any person aggrieved by a final decision of the adjudicative process set forth in Section 65-43-77, may appeal such decision within ten (10) days from the date of the postmark appearing on the notice of final decision mailed to the contestant. The appeal shall be initiated by the filing of a written notice of appeal accompanied by a bill of exceptions which shall embody the facts, order and decision of the adjudicative body and which shall be signed by the party executing the final decision appealed from.  The contestant shall file the notice of appeal and bill of exceptions in the circuit court of the county in which the alleged violation took place and the court shall hear and determine the same on the case as presented by the bill of exceptions as an appellate court and shall affirm or reverse the final decision.  A copy of that notice and bill of exceptions must be provided to all parties or their attorneys of record and the lower authority whose order or judgment is being appealed.  A certificate of service must accompany the written notice of appeal.  If the decision be reversed, the circuit court shall render such order or judgment and certify same to that body; and the costs shall be awarded as in other cases. The contents of the adjudicative body's official file in the case, including a copy of the notice of toll evasion violation, shall be made a part of the record on appeal and shall constitute prima facie evidence of the facts stated therein.  A copy of the written notice of appeal shall be served by the contestant by certified mail, return receipt requested, upon the adjudicative body by service upon the party executing the final decision. (2)  If no written notice of appeal of the final decision is filed within the period set forth in subsection (1) of this section, the decision shall be deemed final. (3)  If the toll evasion penalty, along with the amount of the unpaid toll, * * * have has not been paid and the decision resulting from the judicial review of the final decision is adverse to the contestant, the processing agency may, promptly after the decision becomes final, proceed to collect the penalty. SECTION 16.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.